Illinois, session 104th, HB2906.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 12-603.1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/12-603.1)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 12-603.1)7    Sec. 12-603.1. Driver and passenger required to use safety 8belts, exceptions and penalty.9    (a) Each driver and passenger of a motor vehicle operated 10on a street or highway in this State shall wear a properly 11adjusted and fastened seat safety belt. A child less than 8 12years of age shall be protected as required pursuant to the 13Child Passenger Protection Act. Each driver of a motor vehicle 14transporting a child 8 years of age or more, but less than 16 15years of age, shall secure the child in a properly adjusted and 16fastened seat safety belt as required under the Child 17Passenger Protection Act. Each driver of a motor vehicle 18transporting a passenger who is unable, due to infirmity, 19illness, or age, to properly adjust and fasten a seat safety 20belt and is not exempted from wearing a seat safety belt under 21subsection (b) shall secure the passenger in a properly 22adjusted and fastened seat safety belt as required under this 23Section.  HB2906- 2 -LRB104 09908 LNS 19978 b1    (b) Paragraph (a) shall not apply to any of the following: 2        1. A driver or passenger frequently stopping and 3    leaving the vehicle or delivering property from the 4    vehicle, if the speed of the vehicle between stops does 5    not exceed 15 miles per hour. 6        2. A driver or passenger possessing a written 7    statement from a physician that such person is unable, for 8    medical or physical reasons, to wear a seat safety belt. 9        3. A driver or passenger possessing an official 10    certificate or license endorsement issued by the 11    appropriate agency in another state or country indicating 12    that the driver is unable for medical, physical, or other 13    valid reasons to wear a seat safety belt. 14        4. A driver operating a motor vehicle in reverse. 15        5. A motor vehicle with a model year prior to 1965. 16        6. A motorcycle or motor driven cycle. 17        7. A moped. 18        8. A motor vehicle which is not required to be 19    equipped with seat safety belts under federal law. 20        9. A motor vehicle operated by a rural letter carrier 21    of the United States postal service while performing 22    duties as a rural letter carrier.23        10. A driver or passenger of an authorized emergency 24    vehicle, except this exception does not apply to vehicles 25    of the fire department; vehicles of the Office of the 26    State Fire Marshal; or ambulances, unless the delivery of   HB2906- 3 -LRB104 09908 LNS 19978 b1    life-saving measures prohibits the use of a seat safety 2    belt. 3        11. A back seat passenger of a taxicab. 4    (c) Failure to wear a seat safety belt in violation of this 5Section or the misuse of a seat safety belt by a driver or 6passenger of a motor vehicle may shall not be considered 7evidence of negligence, shall not limit the liability of an 8insurer, and may shall not diminish any recovery for damages 9arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or operation of a 10motor vehicle but shall not limit the liability of an insurer.11    (d) A violation of this Section shall be a petty offense 12and subject to a fine not to exceed $25.13    (e) (Blank).14    (f) A law enforcement officer may not search or inspect a 15motor vehicle, its contents, the driver, or a passenger solely 16because of a violation of this Section.17(Source: P.A. 97-16, eff. 1-1-12; 97-333, eff. 8-12-11; 1898-451, eff. 8-16-13.)